Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1085
911 service; immunity from liability.

The 911 service described in the 911 Service System Act is within the governmental powers and authorities of a local governing body or public safety agency. In contracting for such 911 service and in providing such 911 service, except for failure to use reasonable care or for intentional acts, each local governing body, public safety agency, and service supplier and their employees and agents shall be immune from liability or the payment for any damages in the performance of installing, maintaining, or providing 911 service.

Laws 1990, LB 240, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1009;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 242;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-441;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 67.

This section does not waive sovereign immunity for claims alleging negligence against any provider of 911 emergency dispatch services. Edwards v. Douglas County, 308 Neb. 259, 953 N.W.2d 744 (2021).